District of Columbia statutes.
42-3508.03

Deferral or forgiveness of water and sewer fees for rehabilitated vacant rental housing.

(a)

Where vacant rental accommodations are being rehabilitated under this subchapter, the Mayor may defer or forgive any outstanding water and sewer fees owed by the property.

(b)

A project under this section shall be subject to certification by the Mayor that it is in the best interest of the District, and is consistent with the District’s rental property needs in terms of its location, type, and variety of sizes of rental units.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 803, 32 DCR 3089
This section is referenced in § 42-3508.04.
1981 Ed., § 45-2583.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3508.01.